lrec2010_examples/estar.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +V +1p +2p +3p +sg +pl +mInd +mSub +mCond +mImp +tFut +tPres +tImp +tPret +pastPart +Gerund GV1 GV2 GV3
LEXICON Root
estar Verb1;


!Verbs ending in ar
LEXICON Verb1
estoy+V+1p+sg+tPres+mInd:estoy #;
estás+V+2p+sg+tPres+mInd:estás #;
está+V+3p+sg+tPres+mInd:está #;
estamos+V+1p+pl+tPres+mInd:estamos #;
estáis+V+2p+pl+tPres+mInd:estáis #;
están+V+3p+pl+tPres+mInd:están #;

estaba+V+1p+sg+tImp+mInd:estaba #;
estaba+V+2p+sg+tImp+mInd:estaba #;
estaba+V+3p+sg+tImp+mInd:estaba #;
estábamos+V+1p+pl+tImp+mInd:estábamos #;
estabais+V+2p+pl+tImp+mInd:estabais #;
estaban+V+3p+pl+tImp+mInd:estaban #;

estuve+V+1p+sg+tPret:estuve #;
estuviste+V+2p+sg+tPret:estuviste #;
estuvo+V+3p+sg+tPret:estuvo #;
estuvimos+V+1p+pl+tPret:estuvimos #;
estuvisteis+V+2p+pl+tPret:estuvisteis #;
estuvieron+V+3p+pl+tPret:estuvieron #;

estaré+V+1p+sg+tFut+mInd:estaré #;
estarás+V+2p+sg+tFut+mInd:estarás #;
estará+V+3p+sg+tFut+mInd:estará #;
estaremos+V+1p+pl+tFut+mInd:estaremos #;
estaréis+V+2p+pl+tFut+mInd:estaréis #;
estarán+V+3p+pl+tFut+mInd:estarán #;

estaría+V+1p+sg+mCond:estaría #;
estarías+V+2p+sg+mCond:estarías #;
estaría+V+3p+sg+mCond:estaría #;
estaríamos+V+1p+pl+mCond:estaríamos #;
estaríais+V+2p+pl+mCond:estaríais #;
estarían+V+3p+pl+mCond:estarían #;

esté+V+1p+sg+tPres+mSub:esté #;
estés+V+2p+sg+tPres+mSub:estés #;
esté+V+3p+sg+tPres+mSub:esté #;
estemos+V+1p+pl+tPres+mSub:estemos #;
estéis+V+2p+pl+tPres+mSub:estéis #;
estén+V+3p+pl+tPres+mSub:estén #;

estuviera+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:estuviera #;
estuvieras+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:estuvieras #;
estuviera+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:estuviera #;
estuviéramos+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:estuviéramos #;
estuvierais+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:estuvierais #;
estuvieran+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:estuvieran #;
estuviese+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:estuviese #;
estuvieses+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:estuvieses #;
estuviese+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:estuviese #;
estuviésemos+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:estuviésemos #;
estuvieseis+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:estuvieseis #;
estuviesen+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:estuviesen #;

estuviere+V+1p+sg+testuvit+mSub:estuviere #;
estuvieres+V+2p+sg+testuvit+mSub:estuvieres #;
estuviere+V+3p+sg+testuvit+mSub:estuviere #;
estuviéremos+V+1p+pl+testuvit+mSub:estuviéremos #;
estuviereis+V+2p+pl+testuvit+mSub:estuviereis #;
estuvieren+V+3p+pl+testuvit+mSub:estuvieren #;

estado+V+pastPart:estado #;

estando+V+Gerund:estando #;
